Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1239
Class 2, 3, or 4 vessel; sound-producing equipment required.

Every vessel of Class 2, 3, or 4 shall be provided with an efficient whistle or other sound-producing mechanical appliance.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 39.